Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1
J

EKYLL ISLAND-STATE PARK AUTHORITY

Cross references.

- Prohibition against selling real property,

§

50-16-3.1

.

12-3-230. Short title.

This part may be cited as the "Jekyll Island - State Park Authority Act."

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 391, § 1.)

12-3-231. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Authority" means the Jekyll Island - State Park Authority created by this part.

"Bonds" or "revenue bonds" means any bonds issued by the authority under this part, including refunding bonds.

"Cost of the project" means the cost of construction; the cost of all lands, properties, rights, easements, and franchises acquired; the cost of all machinery and equipment; financing charges; interest prior to and during construction and for one year after completion of construction; cost of engineering; architectural and legal expenses, cost of plans and specifications, and other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the project; administrative expense; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing authorized by this part, the construction of any project, the placing of the same in operation, and the condemnation of property necessary for such construction and operation. Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the foregoing purposes shall be regarded as a part of the cost of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of revenue bonds issued under this part for such project.

"Developed land" means land that is built upon or paved or land that has been disturbed and no longer retains original, natural functions. Specific examples include, but are not limited to:

Roads and bike paths in active use, whether by the authority or the general public;

Multiuse trails and pathways, whether paved or of pervious surface material;

Utility easements;

Firebreaks intended to protect residential areas;

Man-made ponds and borrow pits; and

Golf courses.

"Master plan" means that document created under the auspices of and adopted by the authority of Jekyll Island and as it may be amended from time to time pursuant to Code Section 12-3-243.1.

"Park" means present and future parks, parkways, park and recreational resources and facilities of the state or any department, agency, or institution of the state, and any such facility constituting part of the State Parks System and shall specifically include Jekyll Island State Park.

"Project" means any subdivision, hotel, cottage, apartment house, public building, school, utility, dock, facility, watercourse, airport, bridge, golf course, tennis court, or other resort recreational facility. This term also means one or a combination of two or more of the following: buildings and facilities, and all other structures, electric, gas, steam, water, and sewerage utilities and facilities of every kind and character deemed by the authority to be necessary or convenient for the efficient operation of any department, board, commission, authority, or agency of the State of Georgia.

"Undeveloped area" means any area that remains free from the built environment. The term shall include, but not be limited to:

Marsh and forest where the canopy and understory remain intact;

Wooded areas that are altered only by installation of firebreaks;

Dirt roads no longer in use and serving no practical function;

Dirt footpaths fewer than six feet in width;

Sand dunes and beach, including associated crossovers; and

Fresh water wetlands.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 5; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 3; Ga. L. 1963, p. 391, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1964, p. 100, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 7; Ga. L. 2014, p. 64, § 1/HB 715; Ga. L. 2014, p. 69, § 1/SB 296.)

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014). For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2014).

12-3-232. Creation of authority as instrumentality of state and public corporation; delegation of powers and duties; duration of existence.

There is created a body corporate and politic to be known as the Jekyll Island - State Park Authority, which shall be deemed to be an instrumentality of the state and a public corporation, and by that name, style, and title such body may contract and be contracted with, sue and be sued, implead and be impleaded, and complain and defend in all courts. The authority may delegate to one or more of its members, or to its officers, agents, and employees, such powers and duties as it may deem proper. The authority shall exist for 99 years and, upon the expiration thereof, shall exist for an additional 40 years.

The authority is assigned to the Department of Natural Resources for administrative purposes only.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 2; Ga. L. 1951, p. 782, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 391, § 2; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1519; Ga. L. 2007, p. 711, § 3/HB 214.)

Cross references.

- Effect of assignment for administrative purposes,

§

50-4-3

.

12-3-233. Appointment of members; terms; vacancies; officers; quorum; reimbursement for expenses; members as constituting policy-making body of authority; executive director.

The authority shall be composed of the commissioner of natural resources or his or her designee and eight residents of this state, two of whom shall be from Chatham, Bryan, Liberty, McIntosh, Glynn, or Camden counties, to be appointed by the Governor. The eight members appointed by the Governor shall be selected from the state at large but shall be representative of the geographical areas of the state. Except as provided in this Code section, the members appointed by the Governor shall serve for a term of four years and until the appointment and qualification of their successors. The first four appointments made by the Governor shall be as follows: one member shall be appointed for a term of one year beginning July 1, 1978; one member shall be appointed for a term of two years beginning July 1, 1978; one member shall be appointed for a term of three years beginning July 1, 1978; and one member shall be appointed for a term of four years beginning July 1, 1978. The fifth member appointed by the Governor shall serve for a term of four years beginning July 1, 1984. The sixth member appointed by the Governor shall serve for an initial term beginning upon appointment and ending on June 30, 1997. The seventh member appointed by the Governor shall serve for an initial term beginning upon appointment and ending on June 30, 1998. The eighth member appointed by the Governor shall serve for an initial term beginning upon appointment and ending on June 30, 1999. Subsequent terms for those members appointed as the sixth, seventh, and eighth members, or their successors, shall be for four years. An appointment by the Governor to fill a vacancy shall be made for the unexpired term.

The Governor shall appoint the chairperson of the authority for a term of one year. A member may serve no more than two consecutive terms as chairperson nor more than two terms as chairperson in any one four-year term as a member of the authority. The authority shall elect one of its members as vice chairperson and shall elect a secretary and treasurer who may not necessarily be a member of the authority. The chairperson shall be selected from among the members appointed by the Governor.

Five members of the authority shall constitute a quorum. No vacancy in the authority shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the authority.

Reserved.

Membership on the authority does not constitute public office and no member shall be disqualified from holding public office by reason of his or her membership.

The members of the authority shall not be entitled to compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties.

The members of the authority shall constitute the policy-making body of the authority. The authority shall employ a full-time executive director to execute the policy decisions of the authority and to provide continuing professional management of the day-to-day activities of the authority.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 3; Ga. L. 1957, p. 608, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2043, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 430, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 872, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 8; Ga. L. 2007, p. 711, § 4/HB 214.)

Cross references.

- Legal mileage allowance,

§

50-19-7

.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, in subsection (b), "four-year" was hyphenated in the second sentence and a hyphen was taken out of "vice chairperson" in the third sentence.

Editor's notes.

- Former subsection (d) was repealed and reserved by its own terms effective December 31, 2009.

12-3-233.1. Jekyll Island Citizens Resource Council; purpose; members; meetings; reimbursement for expenses.

The Governor shall appoint a body to be known as the Jekyll Island Citizens Resource Council. The purpose of the Citizens Resource Council shall be to improve, foster, and encourage communication and the exchange of thoughts and ideas between the authority and the community of persons interested in Jekyll Island including, but not limited to, residents of Jekyll Island; owners, operators, and employees of businesses located on or providing services to Jekyll Island; and environmental organizations.

The Citizens Resource Council shall consist of seven members. Three members shall be representative of the Jekyll Island residential and business community with two of these members being residents of Jekyll Island and one being an owner, manager, or employee of a business or commercial facility located on Jekyll Island. Four members shall be appointed at large. The term of each member shall be for two years, provided that of the members first appointed, three shall be appointed for terms of one year, and four for terms of two years. Vacancies shall be filled by similar appointment for unexpired terms.

The Citizens Resource Council shall meet once a month. The meetings shall be attended by the authority's executive director and at least one member of the authority. Once in every calendar quarter, the meeting of the Citizens Resource Council shall be held as a town meeting at which comments and sentiments from the Jekyll Island community at large may be received.

The Citizens Resource Council shall be available to consult with the authority, if requested by the authority to do so, as to the authority's programs, projects, and actions concerning Jekyll Island. The Citizens Resource Council may also, upon request of the authority, review and prepare written comments on proposed authority plans and projects. Such written comments may be submitted to the authority's executive director, the authority, and the Governor.

Members of the Citizens Resource Council shall serve without compensation, but its members who are not employees or officials of state or local governmental entities shall receive reimbursement from funds available to the authority for their actual expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-233.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 10.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, a comma was inserted after "projects" in the first sentence of subsection (d).

12-3-234. Accountability of authority members as trustees; maintenance of financial records and books; creation of Jekyll Island-State Park Authority Oversight Committee.

The members of the authority shall be accountable in all respects as trustees. The authority shall keep suitable and proper books and records of all receipts, income, and expenditures of every kind and shall submit for inspection all of the books, together with a proper statement of the authority's financial position, once a year on or about December 31 to the state auditor and to the Jekyll Island - State Park Authority Oversight Committee. The books and records shall be inspected and audited by the state auditor at least once in each year. The authority shall also submit a quarterly summary of each lease and contract agreement involving an amount in excess of $50,000.00 to the legislative oversight committee. Upon request, a copy of the lease or contract agreement or other documents so requested shall be provided to the members of the oversight committee.

There is created as a joint committee of the General Assembly the Jekyll Island - State Park Authority Oversight Committee to be composed of three members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House, one of whom shall be from the House Committee on State Properties, and three members of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate, one of whom shall be from the Senate Committee on State Institutions and Property. The members of the committee shall serve two-year terms concurrent with their terms as members of the General Assembly. The chairperson of the committee shall be appointed by the President of the Senate from the membership of the committee, and the vice chairperson of the committee shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House from the membership of the committee during odd-numbered years. The chairperson of the committee shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House from the membership of the committee, and the vice chairperson of the committee shall be appointed by the President of the Senate from the membership of the committee during even-numbered years. The chairperson and vice chairperson shall serve terms of one year beginning January 1, 2007. Vacancies in an appointed member's position or in the offices of chairperson or vice chairperson of the committee shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment. The committee shall advise the General Assembly regarding the authority's compliance with the provisions required by this part. The committee shall meet upon the call of the chairperson.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 4; Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 9; Ga. L. 2007, p. 711, § 5/HB 214; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 12/HB 79.)

12-3-235. Powers of authority generally.

The authority shall have power:

To have a seal and alter it at pleasure;

To acquire, hold, and dispose of personal property for its corporate purposes;

To sell, by competitive bids, and dispose of all junk, salvage, and surplus materials, together with all obsolete, unused, or surplus machinery or equipment now or in the future upon or affixed to its leasehold property; and to apply the proceeds therefrom to permanent improvements on the island;

To appoint and select officers, agents, and employees, including engineering, architectural, and construction experts and attorneys, and to fix their compensation;

To make contracts, and to execute all instruments necessary or convenient, including contracts for construction of projects or contracts with respect to the leasing or use of projects which it causes to be subdivided, erected, or acquired;

To plan, survey, subdivide, improve, administer, construct, erect, acquire, own, repair, remodel, maintain, add to, extend, improve, equip, operate, and manage projects as defined in Code Section 12-3-231, to be located on property owned or leased by the authority, the cost of any such project to be paid from its income, from the proceeds of revenue anticipation certificates of the authority, or from such proceeds and any grant from the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or from the State of Georgia; provided, however, that the authority shall not undertake any such activity having a projected cost of over $1 million unless it has first evaluated the feasibility of involving private persons or entities in the development, construction, operation, and management of the authority's existing projects and such proposed activities and has filed a copy of such evaluation with the Office of Planning and Budget and with the Recreational Authorities Overview Committee;

To accept loans and grants, either or both, of money or materials or property of any kind from the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, including the Department of Housing and Urban Development, upon such terms and conditions as the United States or such agency or instrumentality, including the Department of Housing and Urban Development, may impose;

To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes, to issue negotiable revenue anticipation certificates from earnings of such projects, and to provide for the payment of the same and for the rights of the holders thereof;

To exercise any power usually possessed by private corporations performing similar functions, which power is not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of this state;

To act as agent for the United States or any agency, department, corporation, or instrumentality thereof, in any manner coming within the purposes or powers of the authority;

To adopt, alter, or repeal its own bylaws, rules, and regulations governing the manner in which its business may be transacted and in which the power granted to it may be enjoyed, as the authority may deem necessary or expedient in facilitating its business;

To receive gifts, donations, or contributions from any person, firm, or corporation;

To hold, use, administer, and expend, for any of the purposes of the authority, such sum or sums as may hereafter be received as income or as gifts or as may be appropriated by authority of the General Assembly;

To do any other things necessary or proper to beautify, improve, and render self-supporting the island park, to make its facilities available to people of average income, and to advertise its beauties to the world;

To acquire in its own name, by purchase, on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper, or by condemnation in accordance with any and all existing laws applicable to the condemnation of property for public use, real property or rights of easement therein or franchises necessary or convenient for its corporate purposes, and to use the same so long as its corporate existence shall continue, and to lease or make contracts with respect to the use of or dispose of the same in any manner it deems to be the best advantage of the authority, the authority being under no obligation to accept and pay for any property condemned under this part except from the funds provided under the authority of this part; and in any proceedings to condemn, such orders may be made by the court having jurisdiction of the suit, action, or proceeding as may be just to the authority and to the owners of the property to be condemned; and no property shall be acquired under this part upon which any lien or other encumbrance exists, unless at the time such property is so acquired a sufficient sum of money is deposited in trust to pay and redeem the fair value of such lien or encumbrance; and if the authority shall deem it expedient to construct any project on lands which are a part of the real estate holdings of the State of Georgia, the Governor is authorized to execute, for and on behalf of the state, a lease upon such lands to the authority for such parcel or parcels as shall be needed for a period not to exceed 50 years; and if the authority shall deem it expedient to construct any project on any other lands, the title to which shall then be in the State of Georgia, the Governor is authorized to convey, for and in behalf of the state, title to such lands to the authority;

To acquire by purchase, lease, or otherwise, and to hold, lease, and dispose of, real and personal property of every kind and character for its corporate purposes;

To make contracts and leases, and to execute all instruments necessary or convenient, including contracts for construction of projects and leases of projects or contracts with respect to the use of projects which it causes to be erected or acquired; and any and all political subdivisions, departments, institutions, or agencies of the state are authorized to enter into contracts, leases, or agreements with the authority, upon such terms and for such purposes as they deem advisable; and without limiting the generality of the above, authority is specifically granted to any department, board, commission, or agency of the State of Georgia to enter into contracts and lease agreements for the use of any structure, building, or facility, or a combination of any two or more structures, buildings, or facilities, of the authority for a term not exceeding 50 years; and any department, board, commission, or agency of the State of Georgia may obligate itself to pay an agreed sum for the use of such property so leased and also to obligate itself as part of the lease contract to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating the property so leased from the authority;

To construct, erect, acquire, own, repair, remodel, maintain, add to, extend, improve, equip, operate, and manage projects as defined in Code Section 12-3-231, to be located on property owned by or leased by the authority, the cost of any such project to be paid in whole or in part from the proceeds of revenue bonds of the authority or from such proceeds and any grant from the United States, the State of Georgia, or any agency or instrumentality thereof;

To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes, to issue negotiable revenue bonds payable solely from funds pledged for that purpose, and to provide for the payment of the same and for the rights of the holders thereof;

To grant franchises to and make contracts with utility companies, both public and private, providing electric light or power, gas, steam heat, telephone, telegraph, cable, television, water, or sewerage services, for the use and occupancy of Jekyll Island or any part thereof, on an exclusive or nonexclusive basis; to permit the rendering of such utility services upon such conditions and for such time as the authority may deem appropriate or convenient;

To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this part; and to do any and all other acts and things which this part authorizes or requires to be done, whether or not included in the general powers mentioned in this Code section;

To provide and operate, at the discretion of the authority, a fire department which shall have the powers of a fire department of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision set forth in Chapter 3 of Title 25 and to exercise the powers of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision set forth in Code Section 25-3-4; and Code Section 25-2-38.1 shall be applicable to the authority and any fire department of the authority in the provision of fire protection and suppression services provided;

(22.1) To sell, upon obtaining a license from the Department of Revenue, alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises only upon property operated and controlled by the authority and located within the territorial limits of Jekyll Island, Georgia; and

To charge fees to all persons, natural and artificial, using or relying upon fire protection and suppression services or public safety services provided by the authority or the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety, which fees and each installment thereof and the interest thereon shall be liens against each tract of land benefited by the fire protection and suppression services or public safety services so provided from the date each such fee is charged until fully paid; and such liens shall be superior to all other liens, except liens for state and county taxes and taxes levied for any and all school purposes, and shall be collected by officers designated by the authority in the same manner as state and county taxes are collected. The annual amount of any fee charged to any person, natural or artificial, or upon any property owned or leased by any such person under this paragraph shall not exceed the annual amount which would be levied for such services by the County of Glynn in the form of ad valorem taxes if such services had been provided by the County of Glynn.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 6; Ga. L. 1951, p. 782, § 2; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1560, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1983, p. 643, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1213, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 12; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1781, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 11.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, "$1 million" was substituted for "$1,000,000.00" in paragraph (6).

12-3-236. Exercise of police power of authority; delegation of power to state or county.

The authority is empowered to exercise such of the police powers of the state as may be necessary to maintain peace and order and to enforce any and all zoning, user, and personal conduct restrictions upon the properties and facilities and the persons under its jurisdiction to the extent that such is lawful under the laws of the nation and the state. The authority may delegate all or any part of performance of this function temporarily or permanently to the state or the county in which the park is located, or both.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 14.)

12-3-236.1. Adoption and enforcement of ordinances and resolutions.

The authority shall have legislative power to adopt reasonable ordinances and resolutions relating to the property, affairs, and government of Jekyll Island, including, without limitation, ordinances and resolutions adopting by reference any or all of the provisions of Chapter 6 of Title 40 in accordance with Code Section 40-6-372, for which no provision has been made by general law and which are not inconsistent with the general laws and Constitution of Georgia. Such ordinances and resolutions shall be enforced by the authority and members of the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety. Members of the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety are authorized to serve and execute warrants and to make arrests for violation of such ordinances and resolutions and shall, upon and within the limits of Jekyll Island, have the same authority, powers, and privileges regarding enforcement of law as the several sheriffs of this state, which authority, powers, and privileges shall be in addition to and not in limitation of all other powers of members of the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety as provided by law. Prosecutions for violations of the ordinances of the authority shall be upon citation or upon accusation as provided in Code Sections 15-10-62 and 15-10-63. The authority may provide that ordinance violations may be tried upon citations with or without a prosecuting attorney as well as upon accusations in the manner prescribed in Code Section 15-10-63.

For purposes of this Code section, the Magistrate Court of Glynn County shall have jurisdiction and authority to hear and try those cases occurring within the limits of Jekyll Island in which a person is charged with violating an ordinance of the authority and to punish violations of such ordinances, all in the manner and to the extent prescribed in Article 4 of Chapter 10 of Title 15. The State Court of Glynn County shall have jurisdiction and authority to hear and try all cases removed from the Magistrate Court of Glynn County for jury trial by any defendant charged with one or more violations of the ordinances of the authority. The Superior Court of Glynn County shall have jurisdiction to review all convictions by certiorari to the superior court. The jurisdiction and authority of the courts of Glynn County provided for in this Code section shall be in addition to and not in limitation of the jurisdiction and authority of such courts as may be now or hereafter provided.

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 1436, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1117, § 1.)

12-3-236.2. Continuation of ordinances and resolutions of authority in force as of April 13, 1981.

All of the provisions of any ordinances and resolutions adopted by the authority and which, as of April 13, 1981, are in force and effect and which are not inconsistent with nor repugnant to Code Section 12-3-236.1 and not in conflict with the Constitution or the general laws of Georgia or the Constitution of the United States shall remain in full force and effect, provided that the authority may at any time repeal, alter, or amend any of such ordinances and resolutions.

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 1436, § 3.)

12-3-237. Rules and regulations for operation of projects authorized.

It shall be the duty of the authority to prescribe rules and regulations for the operation of each project or combination of projects constructed under this part, including rules and regulations to ensure maximum use or occupancy of each such project.

(Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-238. Easements and rights of way for intracoastal waterway.

The authority shall be authorized to execute to the United States of America such spoilage easements and rights of way in the property leased to the authority by this part as shall be necessary in the construction and maintenance of the intracoastal waterway. Such easements and rights of way shall not exceed in length such period of time as the authority is to exist under this part.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 23A; Ga. L. 1951, p. 782, § 5; Ga. L. 1952, p. 276, § 5; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 4.)

12-3-239. Establishment of museum.

The authority shall retain all books, china, furnishings, materials, and other personal property which are intrinsically associated with the history of Jekyll Island and its previous owners, so that an appropriate museum thereof may be later established.

(Ga. L. 1951, p. 782, § 6.)

12-3-240. Transfer of funds to authority; cooperation between authority and department.

The Office of Planning and Budget is authorized to transfer sufficient funds in the manner provided in Code Section 45-12-72 to provide for the development and operation of the facilities on Jekyll Island, which development and operation shall be carried on by the authority under agreement with the department.

(Ga. L. 1957, p. 608, § 6.)

12-3-241. Lease to authority of Jekyll Island, adjacent marshes and marsh islands, rights of way, and rights and privileges of every kind.

To the authority is granted, for and on the part of the State of Georgia, a lease for a term of 99 years, beginning on February 13, 1950, which term shall be automatically extended an additional 40 years upon the ending of the initial term. The lease shall be for all of that island of the State of Georgia, County of Glynn, being known as Jekyll Island and the marshes and marsh islands adjacent and adjoining the same owned by the State of Georgia; being that island of 11,000 acres, more or less, lying east of the mainland coast of Georgia, County of Glynn, bounded on its easterly shore by the Atlantic Ocean; bounded upon its northerly shore by Brunswick River, bounded on its westerly shore by Brunswick River, Jekyll Creek, Jekyll River, and Jekyll Sound; and bounded on its southerly shore by Jekyll Sound, together with the adjacent and adjoining marshes and marsh islands; which properties may also be described as all of the lands acquired by the State of Georgia in a certain condemnation proceeding, State of Georgia vs. Jekyll Island Club, Inc., et al., filed June 6, 1947, in Glynn County Superior Court; which properties may also be described in all conveyances, conveying any and all parts of Jekyll Island and the adjacent and adjoining marshes and marsh islands to the State of Georgia, recorded upon the official deed books of Glynn County as of February 13, 1950, all and each one of said conveyances being, by reference, expressly incorporated into this Code section and made in their entireties a part hereof.

Also included in the lease granted by this Code section are all rights, rights of ways, water rights, immunities, easements, profits, appurtenances, and privileges thereof or relating thereto of every kind; all improvements, permanent or temporary, located thereon or dedicated to the use or service thereof; and in addition all personal property or property of any kind of the State of Georgia located thereon or dedicated to the use or service thereof.

This lease shall be for and in consideration of $1.00 annually for each calendar year or fraction thereof paid in hand to and receipted for by the Office of the State Treasurer, and in consideration of the reasonable compliance of the authority with this part; provided, that the grant and conveyance made by this Code section shall include the right of the authority to dispose of that portion of the personal property conveyed by this Code section as is defined in paragraphs (2) and (3) of Code Section 12-3-235.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 8; Ga. L. 1951, p. 782, § 3; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 261, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 2007, p. 711, § 6/HB 214; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296.)

12-3-242. Lease payments by authority as constituting good, valuable, and sufficient consideration.

It is found, determined, and declared that the consideration paid and given and to be paid and given to the State of Georgia by the authority for its leasehold and privileges thereunder is good and valuable and sufficient consideration therefor and that this action on the part of the authority and the state is in the interest of the public welfare of the State of Georgia and its citizens.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 9.)

12-3-243. Subdivision, improvement, lease, or sale of island by authority - Limitations on developed area; beaches to remain free and open; protected areas; disposition of proceeds of sale; creation of reserve fund; signing conveyances.

The authority is empowered to convert no more than 1,675 acres of the total land area of Jekyll Island into developed land. All residual acreage shall forever be retained as undeveloped area. For purposes of this subparagraph, the 1,597 acres of Jekyll Island that, as of January 1, 2014, have been subdivided, leased, or improved according to the 2013 master plan shall be deemed as already converted to developed land.

After July 1, 2014, undeveloped area shall be converted to developed land only as follows:

Twelve acres to be used solely for the expansion of the existing campground;

Forty-six acres to be used solely for public health, public safety, or public recreation. As used in this division, the term "public recreation" specifically excludes residential and commercial development; and

Twenty acres to be available for unrestricted uses.

After July 1, 2014, the proposed conversion of any undeveloped area to developed land shall be subject to the amendment procedure outlined in subsection (c) of Code Section 12-3-243.1.

The authority may survey, subdivide, and lease any acreage which may be converted to developed land in accordance with paragraph (1) of this subsection, provided that the authority shall in no way sell or otherwise dispose of any riparian rights; and provided, further, that the beach areas of Jekyll Island shall never be leased but shall be kept free and open for the use of the people of this state.

That portion of Jekyll Island lying south of 31 degrees, 1 minute, 34 seconds north latitude as such latitude is depicted on the 1993 USGS topographic survey 7.5 minute series quadrangle map shall always be retained as undeveloped area, and the authority shall not enter into, renew, or extend any agreement or otherwise take any action regarding such southern portion of the island on or after May 30, 2007, except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph. The removal of any improvement on such southern portion of the island which was completed prior to May 30, 2007, shall not be required. Upon the expiration or termination of any lease of a lot for a single-family residence on such southern portion of the island, the authority may again lease such lot to the same or another lessee for a single-family residence or noncommercial purpose or the authority may set aside the lot for public use; but the lot shall not be further subdivided, and the authority shall not lease such lot for any multifamily residence or commercial purpose. Those properties used for the Jekyll Island 4-H center and soccer complex may continue to be used and improved for the same or similar purposes under an extension or renewal of an existing lease or under a new lease. This subparagraph shall not prohibit the construction and use of any public bicycle trails, public nature trails, or public picnic areas on such southern portion of the island by the authority. This subparagraph shall not be applied to impair the obligation of any valid contract entered into prior to May 30, 2007.

The authority shall deduct and retain as income from the amounts received for any sales of lots the value of its leasehold estate in such property, which shall be determined by agreement between the authority and the Governor. The remainder of such amounts shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the general fund. Ninety percent of the income received by the authority from the sale of lots shall be paid into a reserve fund to be set up by the authority to be used for general improvements or capital improvements, or both, on Jekyll Island.

All conveyances for the sale of lots shall be signed by the authority on its own behalf and by the Governor on behalf of the state.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 10; Ga. L. 1952, p. 276, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 261, § 2; Ga. L. 1957, p. 608, § 2; Ga. L. 1971, p. 452, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 12; Ga. L. 2007, p. 711, § 7/HB 214; Ga. L. 2014, p. 64, § 2/HB 715; Ga. L. 2014, p. 69, § 2/SB 296.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2007, "May 30, 2007" was substituted for "the effective date of this subparagraph" in subparagraph (a)(2)(B) three times.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2007, p. 711,

§

1/HB 214, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "The Georgia General Assembly finds that Jekyll Island is home to some of the state's most treasured natural and cultural resources and it is the expressed intent of this body to ensure the preservation of these resources for the enjoyment of all Georgians now and for future generations to come. For this reason, the state shall continue its commitment
that not less than 65 percent of the land area of Jekyll Island which lies above water at mean high tide shall remain undeveloped. Jekyll Island proudly displays one of Georgia's
largest stretches of barrier island property. It is the expressed intent of this body that the beach areas of Jekyll Island will remain free and open for the use of the people of the state. Commercial improvement is intended to better existing and future development of the remaining 35 percent of Jekyll Island while retaining public access to the beaches for the pleasure of all of Georgia's citizens. The General Assembly further finds that the deteriorating conditions of public and commercial facilities is of great interest to the legislature and to the public and that by significantly extending the existing lease authority for the island's property, the state will thereby help to secure and encourage future investments and provide a basis for long-term revitalization of the island. Jekyll Island is recognized by this body as 'Georgia's Jewel,' and its remarkable beauties are hereby preserved so that they may continue to shine for all citizens of Georgia."

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014). For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2014).